Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,131
Action against several claimants of office or franchise.

When several persons claim to be entitled to the same office or franchise, an information may be filed against all or any portion thereof, in order to try their respective rights thereto.

R.S.1867, Code § 714, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8338;

C.S.1922, § 9290;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,122;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,131.